California statutes. Penal Code
(d) Any person who, for the purpose of selling, leasing or otherwise disposing of merchandise, supplies or equipment used in fire prevention or suppression, falsely represents, in any manner whatsoever, to any other person that they are a fire marshal, fire inspector or member of a fire department, or that they have the approval, endorsement or authorization of any fire marshal, fire inspector or fire department, or member thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) (1) Vendors of uniforms shall verify that a person purchasing a uniform identifying a firefighting agency or department is an employee or authorized member of the agency or
 department identified on the uniform. Examination of a valid photo identification card issued by a firefighting agency or department that designates the person as an employee or authorized member of the agency or department identified on the uniform shall be sufficient verification.

(2) If a person purchasing a uniform does not have a valid photo identification card issued by a firefighting agency or department, the person shall present an official letter of authorization from the firefighting agency or department designating that person as an employee or authorized member of the agency or department. The person shall also present a government issued photo identification card bearing the same name as listed in the letter of authorization issued by the agency or department.

(3) Any uniform vendor who sells a uniform identifying a firefighting agency or department without verifying that the purchaser is an employee or authorized member of the agency or department is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) This subdivision shall not apply if the uniform is to be used solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, video production, or a theatrical event, and prior written permission has been obtained from the identified firefighting agency or department.

(f) This section shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) Use of a badge solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production, or an entertainment
 or theatrical event.

(2) A badge supplied by a recognized employee organization as defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code representing firefighters or a state or international organization to which it is affiliated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 4.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

538f.

Any person, other than an employee of a public utility or district as defined in Sections 216 and 11503 of the Public Utilities Code, respectively, who willfully presents themselves to a utility or district customer with the intent of fraudulently personating an employee of a public utility or district, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an employee of a public utility or district, or who willfully and credibly impersonates an employee of a public utility or district on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or
 by both that fine and imprisonment. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit conduct that arguably constitutes protected activity under state labor law or the National Labor Relations Act (Title 29, United States Code, Section 151 and following).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 5.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

538g.

(a) Any person, other than a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized badge, photographic identification card, or insignia of a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, with the intent of fraudulently personating a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, or who willfully and credibly impersonates such an officer or member on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a
 misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses, or willfully makes, sells, loans, gives, or transfers to another, any badge, photographic identification card, or insignia, which falsely purports to be for the use of a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, or which so resembles the authorized badge, photographic identification card, or insignia of a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee as would deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for use by a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, is guilty of a misdemeanor, except that any person who makes or sells any badge under the circumstances described in this subdivision is subject to a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand
 dollars ($15,000).

(c) This section shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) Use of a badge solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production, or an entertainment or theatrical event.

(2) A badge supplied by a recognized employee organization as defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code or a state or international organization to which it is affiliated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 6.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

538h.

(a) Any person, other than an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or uses the same to obtain aid, money, or assistance within this state, or who willfully and credibly impersonates
 such an officer or member on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) (1) Any person, other than the one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the badge of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to
 exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Any person who willfully wears or uses any badge that falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or that resembles the authorized badge of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team as would deceive any ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, for the purpose of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated
 search and rescue unit or team, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Member” means any natural person who is registered with an accredited disaster council for the purpose of engaging in disaster service without pay or other consideration. Food and lodging provided, or expenses reimbursed for these items, during a member’s activation do not constitute other consideration.

(2) “Search and rescue unit or team” means an entity engaged in the acts of searching for, rescuing, or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity, any person that becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result of a natural or manmade disaster, including instances involving searches for downed or missing aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 7.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

538i.

(a) Any person, other than a first responder, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of a first responder with the intent of fraudulently impersonating a first responder in an area subject to an evacuation order or who willfully and credibly impersonates a first responder on an internet website, or by other electronic means, during an evacuation order or within 30 days of its termination, for purposes of defrauding another, shall be punished by either imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or
 by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and by a fine not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Evacuation order” has the same meaning as in Section 463.

(2) “First responder” means a first responder as defined under Section 8562 of the Government Code, or any employee of the Federal Emergency
 Management Agency under Section 313 of Subchapter V of Chapter 1 of Title 6 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 545, Sec. 3.   (SB 571)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

538.5.

Every person who transmits or causes to be transmitted by means of wire, radio or television communication any words, sounds, writings, signs, signals, or pictures for the purpose of furthering or executing a scheme or artifice to obtain, from a public utility, confidential, privileged, or proprietary information, trade secrets, trade lists, customer records, billing records, customer credit data, or accounting data by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, personations, or promises is guilty of an offense punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 389.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

539.

Every person who, with the intent to defraud, certifies that a person ordered by the court to participate in community service as a condition of probation has completed the number of hours of community service prescribed in the court order and the participant has not completed the prescribed number of hours, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Crimes Against Insured Property and Insurers [548. - 551.]

548.

(a) Every person who willfully injures, destroys, secretes, abandons, or disposes of any property which at the time is insured against loss or damage by theft, or embezzlement, or any casualty with intent to defraud or prejudice the insurer, whether the property is the property or in the possession of that person or any other person, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years and by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

For purposes of this section, “casualty” does not include fire.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) and who has a prior conviction of the
 offense set forth in that subdivision, in Section 550 of this code, or in former Section 556 or former Section 1871.1 of the Insurance Code, shall receive a two-year enhancement for each prior conviction in addition to the sentence provided under subdivision (a). The existence of any fact which would subject a person to a penalty enhancement shall be alleged in the information or indictment and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 390.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

549.

Any firm, corporation, partnership, or association, or any person acting in his or her individual capacity, or in his or her capacity as a public or private employee, who solicits, accepts, or refers any business to or from any individual or entity with the knowledge that, or with reckless disregard for whether, the individual or entity for or from whom the solicitation or referral is made, or the individual or entity who is solicited or referred, intends to violate Section 550 of this code or Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code is guilty of a crime, punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, two years, or three years, or by a fine not
 exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or double the amount of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by that imprisonment and a fine of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Restitution shall be ordered, including restitution for any medical evaluation or treatment services obtained or provided. The court shall determine the amount of restitution and the person or persons to whom the restitution shall be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 391.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

550.

(a) It is unlawful to do any of the following, or to aid, abet, solicit, or conspire with any person to do any of the following:

(1) Knowingly present or cause to be presented any false or fraudulent claim for the payment of a loss or injury, including payment of a loss or injury under a contract of insurance.

(2) Knowingly present multiple claims for the same loss or injury, including presentation of multiple claims to more than one insurer, with an intent to defraud.

(3) Knowingly cause or participate in a vehicular collision, or any other vehicular accident, for the purpose of presenting any
 false or fraudulent claim.

(4) Knowingly present a false or fraudulent claim for the payments of a loss for theft, destruction, damage, or conversion of a motor vehicle, a motor vehicle part, or contents of a motor vehicle.

(5) Knowingly prepare, make, or subscribe any writing, with the intent to present or use it, or to allow it to be presented, in support of any false or fraudulent claim.

(6) Knowingly make or cause to be made any false or fraudulent claim for payment of a health care benefit.

(7) Knowingly submit a claim for a health care benefit that was not used by, or on behalf of, the claimant.

(8) Knowingly present multiple claims for payment of the same health care benefit with an
 intent to defraud.

(9) Knowingly present for payment any undercharges for health care benefits on behalf of a specific claimant unless any known overcharges for health care benefits for that claimant are presented for reconciliation at that same time.

(10) For purposes of paragraphs (6) to (9), inclusive, a claim or a claim for payment of a health care benefit also means a claim or claim for payment submitted by or on the behalf of a provider of any workers’ compensation health benefits under the Labor Code.

(b) It is unlawful to do, or to knowingly assist or conspire with any person to do, any of the following:

(1) Present or cause to be presented any written or oral statement as part of, or in support of or opposition to, a claim for payment or other
 benefit pursuant to an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains any false or misleading information concerning any material fact.

(2) Prepare or make any written or oral statement that is intended to be presented to any insurer or any insurance claimant in connection with, or in support of or opposition to, any claim or payment or other benefit pursuant to an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains any false or misleading information concerning any material fact.

(3) Conceal, or knowingly fail to disclose the occurrence of, an event that affects any person’s initial or continued right or entitlement to any insurance benefit or payment, or the amount of any benefit or payment to which the person is entitled.

(4) Prepare or make any written or oral statement, intended to be presented to any
 insurer or producer for the purpose of obtaining a motor vehicle insurance policy, that the person to be the insured resides or is domiciled in this state when, in fact, that person resides or is domiciled in a state other than this state.

(c) (1) Every person who violates paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, and by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or double the amount of the fraud, whichever is greater.

(2) Every person who violates paragraph (6), (7), (8), or (9) of subdivision (a) is guilty of a public offense.

(A) When the claim or amount at issue exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), the offense is punishable by
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or double the amount of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(B) When the claim or amount at issue is nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less, the offense is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, unless the aggregate amount of the claims or amount at issue exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) in any 12-consecutive-month period, in which case the claims or amounts may be charged as in subparagraph (A).

(3) Every person who violates paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or double the amount of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(4) Restitution shall be ordered for a person convicted of violating this section, including restitution for any medical evaluation or treatment services obtained or provided. The court shall determine the amount of restitution and the person or persons to whom the restitution shall be paid.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, probation shall not be granted
 to, nor shall the execution or imposition of a sentence be suspended for, any adult person convicted of felony violations of this section who previously has been convicted of felony violations of this section or Section 548, or of Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, or former Section 556 of the Insurance Code, or former Section 1871.1 of the Insurance Code as an adult under charges separately brought and tried two or more times. The existence of any fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under this subdivision shall be alleged in the information or indictment, and either admitted by the defendant in an open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

Except when the existence of the fact was not admitted or found to be true or the court finds that a prior felony conviction was invalid, the court shall
 not strike or dismiss any prior felony convictions alleged in the information or indictment.

This subdivision does not prohibit the adjournment of criminal proceedings pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) or Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) and who has a prior felony conviction of an offense set forth in either subdivision (a) or (b), in Section 548, in Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, in former Section 556 of the Insurance Code, or in former Section 1871.1 of the Insurance Code shall receive a two-year enhancement for each prior felony conviction in addition to the sentence provided in subdivision (c). The existence of any fact that would subject a person to a penalty enhancement shall be alleged in the information or indictment and
 either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury. Any person who violates this section shall be subject to appropriate orders of restitution pursuant to Section 13967 of the Government Code.

(f) Any person who violates paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and who has two prior felony convictions for a violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall receive a five-year enhancement in addition to the sentence provided in subdivision (c). The existence of any fact that would subject a person to a penalty enhancement shall be alleged in the information or indictment and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by
 the court sitting without a jury.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in Section 12022.7, any person who violates paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall receive a two-year enhancement for each person other than an accomplice who suffers serious bodily injury resulting from the vehicular collision or accident in a violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(h) This section shall not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of criminal law or equitable remedy that applies or may apply to any act committed or alleged to have been committed by a person.

(i) Any fine imposed pursuant to this section shall be doubled if the offense was committed in connection with any claim pursuant to any automobile insurance policy in an auto insurance fraud crisis area designated by the Insurance Commissioner
 pursuant to Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 1874.90) of Chapter 12 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 392.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

(a) It is unlawful for any automotive repair dealer, contractor, or employees or agents thereof to offer to any insurance agent, broker, or adjuster any fee, commission, profit sharing, or other form of direct or indirect consideration for referring an insured to an automotive repair dealer or its employees or agents for vehicle repairs covered under a policyholder’s automobile physical damage or automobile collision coverage, or to a contractor or its employees or agents for repairs to or replacement of a structure covered by a residential or commercial insurance policy.

(b) Except in cases in which the amount of the repair or replacement claim has been determined by the insurer and the repair or replacement services are
 performed in accordance with that determination or in accordance with provided estimates that are accepted by the insurer, it is unlawful for any automotive repair dealer, contractor, or employees or agents thereof to knowingly offer or give any discount intended to offset a deductible required by a policy of insurance covering repairs to or replacement of a motor vehicle or residential or commercial structure. This subdivision does not prohibit an advertisement for repair or replacement services at a discount as long as the amount of the repair or replacement claim has been determined by the insurer and the repair or replacement services are performed in accordance with that determination or in accordance with provided estimates that are accepted by the insurer.

(c) A violation of this section is a public offense. Where the amount at issue exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), the offense is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. In all other cases, the offense is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) Every person who, having been convicted of subdivision (a) or (b), or Section 7027.3 or former Section 9884.75 of the Business and Professions Code and having served a term therefor in any penal institution or having been imprisoned therein as a condition of probation for that offense, is subsequently convicted of subdivision (a) or (b), upon a subsequent conviction of one of those offenses, shall be punished by
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Automotive repair dealer” means a person who, for compensation, engages in the business of repairing or diagnosing malfunctions of motor vehicles.

(2) “Contractor” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 7026 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 393.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Unlawful Interference With Property [552. - 558.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Trespassing or Loitering Near Posted Industrial Property [552. - 555.5.]

552.

This article does not apply to any entry in the course of duty of any peace or police officer or other duly authorized public officer, nor does it apply to the lawful use of an established and existing right of way for public road purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

552.1.

This article does not prohibit:

(a) Any lawful activity for the purpose of engaging in any organizational effort on behalf of any labor union, agent, or member thereof, or of any employee group, or any member thereof, employed or formerly employed in any place of business or manufacturing establishment described in this article, or for the purpose of carrying on the lawful activities of labor unions, or members thereof.

(b) Any lawful activity for the purpose of investigation of the safety of working conditions on posted property by a representative of a labor union or other employee group who has upon his person written evidence of due authorization by his labor union or employee group to make such investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

The following definitions apply to this article only:

(a) “Sign” means a sign not less than one (1) square foot in area and upon which in letters not less than two inches in height appear the words “trespassing-loitering forbidden by law,” or words describing the use of the property followed by the words “no trespassing.”

(b) “Posted property” means any property specified in Section 554 which is posted in a manner provided in Section 554.1.

(c) “Posted boundary” means a line running from sign to sign and such line need not conform to the legal boundary or legal description of any lot, parcel, or acreage of land, but only the area within the posted boundary shall constitute posted property, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e) of Section 554. 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

Any property, except that portion of such property to which the general public is accorded access, may be posted against trespassing and loitering in the manner provided in Section 554.1, and thereby become posted property subject to the provisions of this article applicable to posted property, if such property consists of, or is used, or is designed to be used, for any one or more of the following:

(a) An oil well, oilfield, tank farm, refinery, compressor plant, absorption plant, bulk plant, marine terminal, pipeline, pipeline pumping station, or reservoir, or any other plant, structure, or works, used for the production, extraction, treatment, handling, storage, or transportation, of oil, gas, gasoline, petroleum, or any product or products thereof.

(b) A gas plant, gas storage station, gas meter, gas valve, or regulator station, gas odorant station, gas pipeline, or appurtenances, or any other property used in the transmission or distribution of gas.

(c) A reservoir, dam, generating plant, receiving station, distributing station, transformer, transmission line, or any appurtenances, used for the storage of water for the generation of hydroelectric power, or for the generation of electricity by water or steam or by any other apparatus or method suitable for the generation of electricity, or for the handling, transmission, reception, or distribution of electric energy.

(d) Plant, structures or facilities used for or in connection with the rendering of telephone or telegraph service or for radio or television broadcasting.

(e) A water well, dam, reservoir, pumping plant, aqueduct, canal, tunnel, siphon, conduit, or any other structure, facility, or conductor for producing, storing, diverting, conserving, treating, or conveying water.

(f) The production, storage, or manufacture of munitions, dynamite, black blasting powder, gunpowder, or other explosives.

(g) A railroad right-of-way, railroad bridge, railroad tunnel, railroad shop, railroad yard, or other railroad facility.

(h) A plant and facility for the collection, pumping, transmission, treatment, outfall, and disposal of sanitary sewerage or storm and waste water, including a water pollution or quality control facility.

(i) A quarry used for the purpose of extracting surface or subsurface material or where explosives are stored or used for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

554.1.

Any property described in Section 554 may be posted against trespassing and loitering in the following manner:

(a) If it is not enclosed within a fence and if it is of an area not exceeding one (1) acre and has no lineal dimension exceeding one (1) mile, by posting signs at each corner of the area and at each entrance.

(b) If it is not enclosed within a fence, and if it is of an area exceeding one (1) acre, or contains any lineal dimension exceeding one (1) mile, by posting signs along or near the exterior boundaries of the area at intervals of not more than 600 feet, and also at each corner, and, if such property has a definite entrance or entrances, at each such entrance.

(c) If it is enclosed within a fence and if it is of an area not exceeding one (1) acre, and has no lineal dimension exceeding one (1) mile, by posting signs at each corner of such fence and at each entrance.

(d) If it is enclosed within a fence and if it is of an area exceeding one (1) acre, or has any lineal dimension exceeding one (1) mile, by posting signs on, or along the line of, such fence at intervals of not more than 600 feet, and also at each corner and at each entrance.

(e) If it consists of poles or towers or appurtenant structures for the suspension of wires or other conductors for conveying electricity or telegraphic or telephonic messages or of towers or derricks for the production of oil or gas, by affixing a sign upon one or more sides of such poles, towers, or derricks, but such posting shall render only the pole, tower, derrick, or appurtenant structure posted property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

It is unlawful to enter or remain upon any posted property without the written permission of the owner, tenant, or occupant in legal possession or control thereof. Every person who enters or remains upon posted property without such written permission is guilty of a separate offense for each day during any portion of which he enters or remains upon such posted property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

555.1.

It is unlawful, without authority, to tear down, deface or destroy any sign posted pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

555.2.

It is unlawful to loiter in the immediate vicinity of any posted property. This section does not prohibit picketing in such immediate vicinity or any lawful activity by which the public is informed of the existence of an alleged labor dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

555.3.

Violation of any of the provisions of this article is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

555.4.

The provisions of this article are applicable throughout the State in all counties and municipalities and no local authority shall enact or enforce any ordinance in conflict with such provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

555.5.

If any provision of this article, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held to be invalid, the remainder of the article, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this article is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such decision shall not affect the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions of this article. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this article and each section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that one or more of the sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, or phrases thereof be declared unconstitutional or invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Unlawfully Placing Signs on Public and Private Property [556. - 556.4.]

556.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to place or maintain, or cause to be placed or maintained without lawful permission upon any property of the State, or of a city or of a county, any sign, picture, transparency, advertisement, or mechanical device which is used for the purpose of advertising or which advertises or brings to notice any person, article of merchandise, business or profession, or anything that is to be or has been sold, bartered, or given away.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

556.1.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to place or maintain or cause to be placed or maintained upon any property in which he has no estate or right of possession any sign, picture, transparency, advertisement, or mechanical device which is used for the purpose of advertising, or which advertises or brings to notice any person, article of merchandise, business or profession, or anything that is to be or has been sold, bartered, or given away, without the consent of the owner, lessee, or person in lawful possession of such property before such sign, picture, transparency, advertisement, or mechanical device is placed upon the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

556.2.

Sections 556 and 556.1 do not prevent the posting of any notice required by law or order of any court, to be posted, nor the posting or placing of any notice, particularly pertaining to the grounds or premises upon which the notice is so posted or placed, nor the posting or placing of any notice, sign, or device used exclusively for giving public notice of the name, direction or condition of any highway, street, lane, road or alley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

556.3.

Any sign, picture, transparency, advertisement, or mechanical device placed on any property contrary to the provisions of Sections 556 and 556.1, is a public nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

556.4.

For purposes of this article, information that appears on any sign, picture, transparency, advertisement, or mechanical device such as, but not limited to, the following, may be used as evidence to establish the fact, and may create an inference, that a person or entity is responsible for the posting of the sign, picture, transparency, advertisement, or mechanical device:

(a) The name, telephone number, address, or other identifying information regarding the real estate broker, real estate brokerage firm, real estate agent, or other person associated with the firm.
